Utah statutes.
17-22-19.   Action for escape or rescue -- Defenses.

An action cannot be maintained against the sheriff for a rescue or for an escape of a person arrested upon an execution or commitment, if after his rescue or escape and before the commencement of the action the prisoner returns to the jail or is retaken by the sheriff or by any other person.



No Change Since 1953

